Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,142
Driving on highway shoulders prohibited; exceptions.

No person shall drive on the shoulders of highways, except that:

(1) Vehicles may be driven on the shoulders of highways (a) by federal mail carriers while delivering the United States mail or (b) to safely remove a vehicle from a roadway;

(2) Implements of husbandry may be driven on the shoulders of highways; and

(3) Bicycles and electric personal assistive mobility devices may be operated on paved shoulders of highways included in the state highway system other than Nebraska segments of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 31;

Laws 1988, LB 969, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-631;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 238;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 7;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 456.

Any crossing of the fog line onto the shoulder constitutes driving on the shoulder and is a violation of this section. State v. Magallanes, 284 Neb. 871, 824 N.W.2d 696 (2012).
Any crossing of the fog line onto the shoulder constitutes driving on the shoulder and is a violation of this section. State v. Magallanes, 284 Neb. 871, 824 N.W.2d 696 (2012).